District of Columbia statutes.
2-274.01

Rules.

(a)

The Office, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including:

(1)

Rules for the development, solicitation, evaluation, award, delivery, and oversight of solicited and unsolicited public-private partnership projects; and

(2)

Rules to ensure that persons responsible for the proper administration of this chapter maintain a position of strict impartiality and refrain from any activity that would imply support or opposition to a particular private entity, proposer, or operator of a public-private partnership agreement.

(b)

The Office shall consult with the Office of the Chief Financial Officer when formulating rules to establish policies and procedures to ensure compliance with relevant laws with regards to the financing of public-private partnership projects.

(c)

(1)

Within 90 days of the appointment of an Executive Director, proposed rules for implementation of this chapter and all procurement procedures shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess.

(2)

If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day period, the rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 301, 62 DCR 261